Missouri, session 2026, SB1600.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 162.720, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 162.720,
to read as follows:
162.720. 1. (1) This subdivision shall apply to all
school years ending before July 1, 2024. Where a sufficient
number of children are identified as gifted and their
development requires programs or services beyond the level
of those ordinarily provided in regular public school
programs, districts may establish special programs for such
gifted children.
(2) For school year 2024-25 and all subsequent school
years, if three percent or more of students enrolled in a
school district are identified as gifted and their
development requires programs or services beyond the level
of those ordinarily provided in regular public school
programs, the district shall establish a state-approved
gifted program for gifted children.
2. For school year 2024-25 and all subsequent school
years, any teacher providing gifted services to students in
districts with an average daily attendance of more than
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1600 2
three hundred fifty students shall be certificated in gifted
education. In districts with an average daily attendance of
three hundred fifty students or fewer, any teacher providing
gifted services shall not be required to be certificated to
teach gifted education but such teacher shall annually
participate in at least six clock hours of professional
development focused on gifted services. The school district
shall pay for such professional development focused on
gifted services.
3. The state board of education shall determine
standards for such gifted programs and gifted services.
Approval of gifted programs shall be made by the state
department of elementary and secondary education based upon
project applications submitted at a time and in a form
determined by the department of elementary and secondary
education.
4. (1) For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent
school years, each school district shall provide universal
screenings for all students at least once before the
beginning of grade three for the purpose of screening for
gifted students. Such screenings shall:
(a) Provide a body of current, valid, and reliable
evidence from a minimum of two areas including, but not
limited to:
a. General mental ability testing;
b. Academic achievement;
c. Creativity;
d. Reasoning;
e. Problem solving;
f. Parent, teacher, student, or self-referrals; and
g. Other evidence of gifts and talents; and

SB 1600 3
(b) Be reviewed by a minimum of three staff members
trained in gifted education, administration, or assessment,
or a combination of such areas for a referral for formal
gifted assessment.
(2) No district shall identify a child as gifted based
solely on the child's participation in an advanced placement
course or international baccalaureate course.
(3) Districts shall identify a child as gifted only if
the child meets the definition of gifted children as
provided in section 162.675.
(4) A child's failure to meet criteria on a single
screening or assessment tool shall not prevent further data
collection or consideration for gifted identification of
such child.
5. [Any district with a gifted education program
approved under subsection 3 of this section] For the 2026-27
school year and all subsequent school years, each school
district shall have a policy, approved by the board of
education of the district, that establishes a process:
(1) For the universal screening of students for gifted
program selection;
(2) For providing annual notification to parents and
guardians of such screening process;
(3) For identifying students for the gifted program
and notifying parents and guardians of the criteria the
district uses for the identification of students for the
gifted program, provided that such criteria shall be guided
by recommendations from the advisory council on the
education of gifted and talented children established under
section 161.249 and the standards established by the state
board of education; and

SB 1600 4
(4) That outlines the procedures and conditions under
which parents or guardians may request a review of the
decision that their child did not qualify to receive
services through the district's gifted education program.
6. School districts and school district employees
shall be immune from liability for any and all acts or
omissions relating to the decision that a child did not
qualify to receive services through the district's gifted
education program.
7. The department of elementary and secondary
education may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations
for the implementation and administration of this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
100 and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
101 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
102 or adopted after August 28, 2022, shall be invalid and void.
✓